test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kuell_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueʹll: # Noun e-stem 'fish/kala' - full paradigm
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kueʹll
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kuâlˈla
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kueʹlest
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kueʹlin
     kueʹll+N+Ess+Indef: kueʹllen
     kueʹll+N+Par+Indef: kueʹlled
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kueʹltaa, kueʹltää]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kueʹli
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kueʹlid
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kueʹlid
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kueʹlin
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kueʹlivuiʹm
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kueʹlitaa, kueʹlitää]
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kueʹlteʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kueʹlteeʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: kueʹlteʹmes
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Comp: kueʹltab
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: kueʹltumus
